Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of Justice shall develop, implement and administer a
statewide Hope Card  Program for the issuance of information cards regarding eligible civil
protection orders.
(2) The department, by  rule, shall establish eligibility requirements for eligible civil pro-
tection orders.
(3) Upon request, the Hope  Card Program shall provide one or more information cards
to a person protected by an eligible civil protection order.
(4) An  information card issued under this section must be a durable, wallet-sized card
containing essential information about the civil  protection order, including the persons sub-
ject to the order, the court case  number and jurisdiction, the issuance and expiration dates
of the order and any other information prescribed by the department by rule.
(5) The Hope Card Program may not charge a fee for an application for or  the issuance
of an information card under this section.
(6) The department, in consultation with Oregon Indian tribes, the Oregon State Police,
the State Court Administrator,  representatives of victim service organizations and other
appropriate entities, shall adopt rules for the administration of the Hope Card Program.
SECTION 2. (1) Section 1 of this 2021 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2022.
(2) The Department of Justice may take  any action before the operative date specified in
subsection (1) of this section that is necessary for the department to exercise, on or  after
the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all  of the duties, functions and
powers conferred on the department by section 1 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Justice by  section 1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled
House Bill 5014), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  for Crime Victims and Survivor
Services, is increased by $120,711 for the implementation of section 1 of this 2021 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2746 (HB 2746-B) Page 1
Passed by House June 17, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2746 (HB 2746-B) Page 2